Utah statutes.
53A-6-206.   Agreement by party states.
The party states agree that:
(1)  They will, so far as practicable, prefer the making of multi-lateral
contracts pursuant to Section 53A-6-204 of this compact.
(2)  They will facilitate and strengthen cooperation in interstate
certification and other elements of educational personnel qualification and
for this purpose shall cooperate with agencies, organizations, and
associations interested in certification and other elements of educational
personnel qualification.
